Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Cyber Crime and
Fraud Unit Fund, established in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1859 of the
2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One
Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary for the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation to carry out the provisions of Enrolled Senate Bill
No. 1859 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

Passed the Senate the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1157 Page 2